Washington statutes.
RCW 10.16.100

Abstract of costs forwarded with transcript.

In all cases where any magistrate shall order a defendant to recognize for his or her appearance before a district or superior court, the magistrate shall forward with the papers in the case, an abstract of the costs that have accrued in the case, and such costs shall be subject to the final determination of the case.

[ 1987 c 202 s 163; Code 1881 s 1937; 1873 p 397 s 236; 1854 p 109 s 44; RRS s 1966.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.